Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1367
Freeways; declaration of legislative intent.

Recognizing that safe and efficient transportation on modern high-speed highways is a matter of important interest to all the people in the state, the Legislature determines and declares that effective maintenance, operation, and control of freeways is essential to the general welfare of the State of Nebraska and is therefor a matter of statewide concern.

The establishment of laws capable of meeting future requirements as well as present demands of safe and efficient transportation is recognized as an urgent problem and a proper objective of highway legislation.

It is the intent of the Legislature to consider of paramount importance the convenience and safety of the traveling public.

The Legislature hereby determines and declares that sections 39-1337, 39-1339, 39-1367, and 39-1372 are necessary for the preservation of the public health and safety, for promotion of the general welfare, and as a contribution to the national defense.

Laws 1961, c. 184, § 1, p. 548;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 40.